Maine, session 132, LD2168.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3360, sub-§3, ¶H, as amended by PL 2013, c. 537, §2, is further
amended to read:
H. Sexual exploitation of a minor as described in Title 17‑A, chapter 12; or
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §3360, sub-§3, ¶J, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 537, §3, is amended
to read:
J. Aggravated sex trafficking or sex trafficking as described in Title 17‑A, sections
852 and 853, respectively.; or
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §3360, sub-§3, ¶K is enacted to read:
K. Commercial sexual exploitation of a minor or person with a mental disability under
Title 17-A, section 855.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §3360-C, sub-§2, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 348, §1, is
further amended to read:
B. To or on behalf of any person who violated a criminal law that caused or contributed
to the injury or death for which compensation is sought, except when the person was
the victim of a criminal homicide and the claimant was not involved in the criminal
conduct or the person was a victim of aggravated sex trafficking or sex trafficking
under Title 17-A, sections 852 and 853, respectively, sexual exploitation of a minor
under Title 17-A, section 282, commercial sexual exploitation of a minor or
commercial sexual exploitation of a person with a mental disability under Title 17-A,
section 855 and the violation of criminal law was the direct result of sex trafficking or
sexual exploitation.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §3360-I, first ¶, as amended by PL 2025, c. 387, §1 and c. 528,
§1, is further amended to read:
As part of the sentence or fine imposed, the court shall impose an assessment of $70
on any person convicted of murder, a Class A crime, a Class B crime or a Class C crime
Page 1 - 132LR2844(03)

and $40 on any person convicted of a Class D crime or a Class E crime, except that the
court shall impose an assessment of $6,000 on any person convicted of aggravated sex
trafficking as described in Title 17‑A, section 852, an assessment of $3,000 on any person
convicted of sex trafficking as described in Title 17‑A, section 853, an assessment of
$1,000 on any person for the first conviction and $2,000 for each subsequent conviction of
engaging a person for prostitution as described in Title 17‑A, section 853‑B, an assessment
of $1,000 on any person for the first conviction and $2,000 for each subsequent conviction
of soliciting a child for commercial sexual exploitation as described in Title 17-A, section
259-B and an assessment of $1,000 $3,000 on any person for the first conviction and $2,000
$6,000 for each subsequent conviction of commercial sexual exploitation of a minor or
commercial sexual exploitation of a person with a mental disability as described in Title
17‑A, section 855. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the court may
not waive the imposition of the assessment required by this section. For purposes of
collection and collection procedures, this assessment is considered part of the fine. At the
time of commitment, the court shall inform the Department of Corrections or the county
sheriff of any unpaid balances on assessments owed by the offender to the Victims'
Compensation Fund. All funds collected as a result of these assessments or transferred in
accordance with Title 34-A, section 1214-C, subsection 5 accrue to the Victims'
Compensation Fund.
Sec. 6. Effective date. This Act takes effect April 1, 2027.
Page 2 - 132LR2844(03)